Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.260

Project review committee—Meetings—Open and public.

(1) The committee shall hold regular public meetings to carry out its duties as described in RCW 39.10.250. Committee meetings are subject to chapter 42.30 RCW.

(2) The committee shall publish notice of its public meetings at least twenty days before the meeting in a legal newspaper circulated in the area where the public body seeking certification is located, or where each of the proposed projects under consideration will be constructed. All meeting notices must be posted on the committee's website.

(3) The meeting notice must identify the public body that is seeking certification or project approval, and where applicable, a description of projects to be considered at the meeting. The notice must indicate when, where, and how the public may present comments regarding the committee's certification of a public body or approval of a project. Information submitted by a public body to be reviewed at the meeting shall be available on the committee's website at the time the notice is published.

(4) The committee must allow for public comment on the appropriateness of certification of a public body or on the appropriateness of the use of the proposed contracting procedure and the qualifications of a public body to use the contracting procedure. The committee shall receive and record both written and oral comments at the public meeting.

[ 2013 c 222 s 6; 2007 c 494 s 106.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.